Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.310

Reservation of name.

(1) A person may reserve the exclusive use of an entity name including the alternate name adopted pursuant to RCW 23.95.525 by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must state the name and address of the applicant and the name to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the entity name is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for one hundred eighty days.

(2) The owner of a reserved entity name may transfer the reservation to another person that is not an individual by delivering to the secretary of state an executed notice in a record of the transfer which states the name and address of the transferee.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1303.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.